Louisiana, session 2026, HB1108.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; "Homeschool Proud"
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the
"Homeschool Proud" plate, which may be issued, upon application, to any citizen of
Louisiana, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such plate.
The plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up trucks, recreational
vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the artist selected by
Homeschool Louisiana to develop the design of the plate, provided that it is in
compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The bottom of the plate shall bear the words
"Homeschool Proud". A symbol representing Homeschool Louisiana shall appear
on the left portion of the plate. The center portion of the plate shall have five alpha-
numeric digits for registration purposes.
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any
citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1108 ENROLLED
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to Homeschool Louisiana. The monies received from the royalty fees shall be used
solely for the activities of Homeschool Louisiana.
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.